Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.500

Uniformed service shared leave pool account.

The uniformed service shared leave pool account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from leave donated under the uniformed service shared leave pool under RCW 41.04.685 and any moneys appropriated or otherwise provided must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for providing shared leave to employees under the uniformed service shared leave pool. Only the adjutant general or his or her designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and no appropriation is required for expenditures.

[ 2007 c 25 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2007 c 25: See notes following RCW 41.04.685.